Massachusetts, session 194th, H4234.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 160 of the acts of 2003 is hereby amended by striking out sections
1 and 2 and inserting in place thereof the following 2 sections:-
Section 1. The chief of police of the town of Fairhaven, with town administrator
approval, may appoint, as they deem necessary, retired Fairhaven police officers as special police
officers for the purpose of performing police details or any other police duties arising therefrom
or during the course of police detail work, regardless of whether or not related to the detail work.
The retired police officers must have been regular Fairhaven police officers and retired based on
superannuation. No retired police officer shall be appointed as a special police officer pursuant to
this act if that officer has been retired for more than 5 years. The special police officers shall not
be subject to the same maximum age restrictions as applied to regular town of Fairhaven police
officers under chapter 32 of the General Laws, but shall not be eligible, to serve as special police
of 3

officers if they have reached the age of 70. A special police officer must pass a medical
examination, by a physician or other certified professional chosen by the town, to determine that
they are capable of performing the essential duties of a special police officer, the cost of which
shall be borne by the special police officer, prior to performing police details.
Section 2. Special police officers appointed under this act shall not be subject to chapter
31 of the General Laws; section 99A of chapter 41 of the General Laws; or chapter 150E of the
General Laws.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 160 is hereby further amended by striking out section 4 and
inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 4. Special police officers shall be appointed for an indefinite term, subject to
removal by the chief of police of the town of Fairhaven, with town administrator approval, at
anytime with 14 days written notice. Upon request, the chief of police shall provide reasons for
removal in writing. A special police officer’s appointment shall automatically terminate upon the
officer reaching the age of 70.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 160 is hereby further amended by striking out section 7 and
inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 7. Special police officers appointed under this act shall be subject to section 100
and section 111F of chapter 41 of the General Laws. The amount payable under said section
111F shall be calculated by averaging the amount earned over the prior 52 weeks as a special
police officer working police details, or averaged over such lesser period of time for any officer
designated as special police officer less than 52 weeks prior to the incapacity. In no event shall
payment under said section 111F exceed, in any calendar year, the limitation on earning
of 3

contained in subsection (b) of section 91 of chapter 32 of the General Laws. Payment under said
section 111F shall terminate in accordance with said section 111F or at the conclusion of the
employment term, whichever occurs sooner. Special police officers appointed under this act shall
not be subject to section 85H of said chapter 32, nor eligible for any benefits pursuant thereto.
SECTION 4. Section 8 of said chapter 160 is hereby amended by inserting after the word
“shall” the following word:- not.
SECTION 5. Said chapter 160 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 8 the
following section:-
Section 8A. A special police officer appointed pursuant to this act shall comply with all
requirements of chapter 6E of the General Laws, including: (i) maintaining certification and
good standing with the Massachusetts peace officer standards and training commission; and (ii)
complying with all annual in-service and other training requirements mandated by the municipal
police training committee.
of 3